fr: farine de blé type 55, farine de blé t55
pl: mąka pszenna typ 550, mąka pszenna 550

en: Wheat flour type 55, Wheat flour T55, Wheat flour type 55 for bread
fr: Farine de blé tendre T55, Farine de blé tendre T55 pour pains
hr: pšenično brašno tip 55
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 55

fr: farine de blé type 65, farine de blé t65
nl: tarwemeel T65
pl: mąka pszenna typ 650

en: refined wheat flour, maida
hr: rafinirano pšenično brašno
it: farina di grano raffinato

en: Wheat flour type 65, Wheat flour T65
fr: Farine de blé tendre T65
hr: pšenično brašno tip 65
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 65

bg: пшенично брашно тип 800
fr: farine de blé t80

bg: био пшенично брашно
fr: farine de blé bio
it: farina bio, farina di grano bio, farina di grano tenero bio
nl: biologische tarwemeel

en: wheat flour type 0, flour type 0
bg: Бяло брашно тип 0
de: Weizenmehl Type 0
fr: farine de blé tendre type 0, farine de blé type 0, Farine blanche type 0
hr: brašno tip 0, brašno tip "0", pšenično brašno tip "0", pšenično brašno tip 0
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 0, farina di grano tipo 0, farina di grano tenero tipo "0", farina di grano tipo "0", farina tipo 0, farina tipo "0", farina di grano tenero tipo o, farina di grano tenero 0, farina di grano tipo o

en: wheat flour type 00, flour type 00
de: Weichweizenmehl Typ 00, Typ 00 Weichweizenmehl, Weizenmehl Typ 00
fr: farine de blé tendre type 00, farine de blé type 00
hr: brašno tip 00, brašno tip "00", pšenično brašno tip "00", pšenično brašno tip 00
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 00, farina di grano tipo 00, farina di grano tenero tipo "00", farina di grano tipo "00", farina tipo 00, farina tipo "00", farina di grano tenero 00
pl: mąka pszenna typ 00

en: wheat flour type 1, flour type 1
de: Weichweizenmehl Typ 1, Typ 1 Weichweizenmehl, Weizenmehl Typ 1
fr: farine de blé tendre type 1, farine de blé type 1
hr: brašno tip 1, brašno tip "1", pšenično brašno tip "1", pšenično brašno tip 1
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 1, farina di grano tipo 1, farina di grano tenero tipo "1", farina di grano tipo "1", farina tipo 1, farina tipo "1"
pl: mąka pszenna typ 1

en: wheat flour type 2, flour type 2
de: Weichweizenmehl Typ 2, Typ 2 Weichweizenmehl, Weizenmehl Typ 2
fr: farine de blé tendre type 2, farine de blé type 2
hr: brašno tip 2, brašno tip "2", pšenično brašno tip "2", pšenično brašno tip 2
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 2, farina di grano tipo 2, farina di grano tenero tipo "2", farina di grano tipo "2", farina tipo 2, farina tipo "2"
pl: mąka pszenna typ 2

en: wheat flour type 500, flour type 500
bg: бяло пшенично брашно тип 500, брашно тип 500, пшенично брашно тип 500
hr: pšenično brašno tip 500
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 500
pl: mąka pszenna typ 500, mąka pszenna 500

en: wheat flour type 550, flour type 550
bg: бяло пшенично брашно тип 550
de: Weizenmehl Type 550
hr: pšenično brašno tip 550, pšenično brašno T-550, pšenično brašno T 550, pšenično brašno tip 550 glatko bijelo, brašno pšenično T-550, brašno T-550, brašno tip 550, pšenično bijelo brašno tip 550, pšenično bijelo brašno t550, pšenično brašno t500, pšenično bijelo tip 550 brašno
it: farina di grano tenero tipo 550

en: wheat flour type 850 semi-white
hr: pšenično brašno tip 850 polubijelo, pšenično brašno tip-850, polubijelo pšenično brašno T-850, pšenično brašno t850, pšenično polubijelo brašno t 850, pšenično polubijelo tip 850, pšenično polubijelo tip 850 brašno

en: wheat flour T-1050
hr: pšenično brašno T-1050

hr: pšenično brašno 1850
pl: mąka pszenna typ 1850, mąka pszenna 1850, mąka pszenna graham

en: durum wheat flour, durum flour
bg: брашно от твърда пшеница
da: durumhvedemel, durummel
de: Hartweizenmehl
ee: durum nisujahu
es: harina de trigo duro
fi: durumvehnäjauho
fr: farine de blé dur
hr: durum pšenično brašno, pšenično durum brašno
hu: durumbúzaliszt
it: farina di grano duro
nl: durum tarwemeel
pl: mąka z pszenicy durum, mąka z pszenicy twardej, mąka makaronowa pszenna, mąka pszenna makaronowa
ro: făină din grâu dur
sv: durumvetemjöl, mjöl av durumvete
uk: борошно з пшеннци тверднх сортив

en: dark durum wheat flour
de: dunkles Hartweizenmehl
fi: tumma durumvehnäjauho
hr: tamno durum pšenično brašno
it: farina di grano duro scura
sv: mörkt durumvetemjöl

en: wholemeal flour
bg: пълнозърнесто брашно, пълнозърнести брашна
ca: farina integral
cs: Celozrnná mouka
da: fuldkornsmel
de: Vollkornmehl
es: harina integral
fi: täysjyväjauho
fr: farine complète
hr: brašno iz cijelog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlélsű liszt
it: farina integrale
lv: pilngraudu milti
nl: volkorenmeel
pl: Mąka pełnoziarnista, pełnoziarnista mąka
ro: făină integrală
ru: мука пшеничная цельнозерновая
sv: fullkornsmjöl

en: semi-wholemeal flour
fr: farine semi-complète
hr: poluintegralno brašno
it: farina semi-integrale